Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.345.050

Association dues—Payment.

The school directors' association may establish a graduated schedule of dues for members of the association based upon the number of certificated personnel in each district. Dues shall be established for the directors of each district as a group. The total of all dues assessed shall not exceed twenty-seven cents for each one thousand dollars of the statewide total of all school districts' general fund receipts. The board of directors of a school district shall make provision for payment out of the general fund of the district of the dues of association members resident in the district, which payment shall be made in the manner provided by law for the payment of other claims against the general fund of the district. The dues for each school district shall be due and payable on the first day of January of each year.

[ 1983 c 187 s 2; 1969 c 125 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.61.050. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 8 s 76; 1965 c 103 s 1; 1957 c 281 s 1; 1953 c 226 s 1; 1947 c 169 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4709-24. Formerly RCW 28A.61.050, 28.58.360.]